District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Consumer Protection Clarification Congressional Review Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 28-3901 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3)(A) “merchant” means a person, whether organized or operating for profit or
for a nonprofit purpose, who in the ordinary course of business does or would sell, lease, or
transfer, either directly or indirectly, consumer goods or services, or a person who in the ordinary
course of business does or would supply the goods or services which are or would be the subject
matter of a trade practice.
“(B) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, “merchant” does
not include the District of Columbia, its agencies or instrumentalities, or any employee thereof
acting within the scope of the employee’s official duties;”.
(b) Subsection (e) is amended to read as follows:
“(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, this chapter’s application to
landlord-tenant relations shall include the District of Columbia Housing Authority’s activities as
a landlord; except, that this chapter shall not be construed to otherwise apply to the District of
Columbia, its agencies or instrumentalities, or any employee thereof acting within the scope of
the employee’s official duties.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) Section 2(a) shall apply as of June 12, 2007.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Section 2(b) shall apply as of November 3, 2022.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2